Illinois, session 104th, SB2872.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 229.4a as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/229.4a)7    Sec. 229.4a. Standard Nonforfeiture Law for Individual 8Deferred Annuities.9    (1) Title. This Section shall be known as the Standard 10Nonforfeiture Law for Individual Deferred Annuities.11    (2) Applicability. 12        (A) This Section shall not apply to any reinsurance, 13    group annuity purchased under a retirement plan or plan of 14    deferred compensation established or maintained by an 15    employer (including a partnership or sole proprietorship) 16    or by an employee organization, or by both, other than a 17    plan providing individual retirement accounts or 18    individual retirement annuities under Section 408 of the 19    Internal Revenue Code, as now or hereafter amended, 20    premium deposit fund, variable annuity, investment 21    annuity, immediate annuity, any deferred annuity contract 22    after annuity payments have commenced, or reversionary 23    annuity, nor to any contract which shall be delivered   SB2872 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16830 BAB 30239 b1    outside this State through an agent or other 2    representative of the company issuing the contract.3        (B) Subsections (3) through (8) shall not apply to 4    contingent deferred annuities. Notwithstanding this 5    exemption, the Director shall have the authority to adopt, 6    by rule, nonforfeiture benefits for contingent deferred 7    annuities that are, in the opinion of the Director, 8    equitable to the contract holder, appropriate given the 9    risks insured, and, to the extent possible, consistent 10    with the general intent of this Section. 11    (3) Nonforfeiture Requirements.12        (A) In the case of contracts issued on or after the 13    operative date of this Section as defined in subsection 14    (13), no contract of annuity, except as stated in 15    subsection (2), shall be delivered or issued for delivery 16    in this State unless it contains in substance the 17    following provisions, or corresponding provisions which in 18    the opinion of the Director of Insurance are at least as 19    favorable to the contract holder, upon cessation of 20    payment of considerations under the contract:21            (i) That upon cessation of payment of 22        considerations under a contract, or upon the written 23        request of the contract owner, the company shall grant 24        a paid-up annuity benefit on a plan stipulated in the 25        contract of such value as is specified in subsections 26        (5), (6), (7), (8), and (10);  SB2872 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16830 BAB 30239 b1            (ii) If a contract provides for a lump sum 2        settlement at maturity, or at any other time, that 3        upon surrender of the contract at or prior to the 4        commencement of any annuity payments, the company 5        shall pay in lieu of a paid-up annuity benefit a cash 6        surrender benefit of such amount as is specified in 7        subsections (5), (6), (8), and (10). The company may 8        reserve the right to defer the payment of the cash 9        surrender benefit for a period not to exceed 6 months 10        after demand therefor with surrender of the contract 11        after making written request and receiving written 12        approval of the Director. The request shall address 13        the necessity and equitability to all policyholders of 14        the deferral;15            (iii) A statement of the mortality table, if any, 16        and interest rates used calculating any minimum 17        paid-up annuity, cash surrender, or death benefits 18        that are guaranteed under the contract, together with 19        sufficient information to determine the amounts of the 20        benefits; and21            (iv) A statement that any paid-up annuity, cash 22        surrender, or death benefits that may be available 23        under the contract are not less than the minimum 24        benefits required by any statute of the state in which 25        the contract is delivered and an explanation of the 26        manner in which the benefits are altered by the   SB2872 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 16830 BAB 30239 b1        existence of any additional amounts credited by the 2        company to the contract, any indebtedness to the 3        company on the contract, or any prior withdrawals from 4        or partial surrenders of the contract.5        (B) Notwithstanding the requirements of this Section, 6    a deferred annuity contract may provide that if no 7    considerations have been received under a contract for a 8    period of 2 full years and the portion of the paid-up 9    annuity benefit at maturity on the plan stipulated in the 10    contract arising from prior considerations paid would be 11    less than $20 monthly, the company may at its option 12    terminate the contract by payment in cash of the then 13    present value of the portion of the paid-up annuity 14    benefit, calculated on the basis on the mortality table, 15    if any, and interest rate specified in the contract for 16    determining the paid-up annuity benefit, and by this 17    payment shall be relieved of any further obligation under 18    the contract.19    (4) Minimum values. The minimum values as specified in 20subsections (5), (6), (7), (8), and (10) of any paid-up 21annuity, cash surrender, or death benefits available under an 22annuity contract shall be based upon minimum nonforfeiture 23amounts as defined in this subsection. 24        (A)(i) The minimum nonforfeiture amount at any time at 25    or prior to the commencement of any annuity payments shall 26    be equal to an accumulation up to such time at rates of   SB2872 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 16830 BAB 30239 b1    interest as indicated in subdivision (4)(B) of the net 2    considerations (as hereinafter defined) paid prior to such 3    time, decreased by the sum of paragraphs (a) through (d) 4    below:5            (a) Any prior withdrawals from or partial 6        surrenders of the contract accumulated at rates of 7        interest as indicated in subdivision (4)(B); 8            (b) An annual contract charge of $50, accumulated 9        at rates of interest as indicated in subdivision 10        (4)(B); 11            (c) Any premium tax paid by the company for the 12        contract, accumulated at rates of interest as 13        indicated in subdivision (4)(B); and 14            (d) The amount of any indebtedness to the company 15        on the contract, including interest due and accrued.16        (ii) The net considerations for a given contract year 17    used to define the minimum nonforfeiture amount shall be 18    an amount equal to 87.5% of the gross considerations, 19    credited to the contract during that contract year.20        (B) The interest rate used in determining minimum 21    nonforfeiture amounts shall be an annual rate of interest 22    determined as the lesser of 3% per annum and the 23    following, which shall be specified in the contract if the 24    interest rate will be reset:25            (i) The 5-year Constant Maturity Treasury Rate 26        reported by the Federal Reserve as of a date, or   SB2872 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 16830 BAB 30239 b1        average over a period, rounded to the nearest 1/20th 2        of one percent, specified in the contract no longer 3        than 15 months prior to the contract issue date or 4        redetermination date under subdivision (4)(B)(iv);5            (ii) Reduced by 125 basis points;6            (iii) Where the resulting interest rate is not 7        less than 0.15%; and8            (iv) The interest rate shall apply for an initial 9        period and may be redetermined for additional periods. 10        The redetermination date, basis, and period, if any, 11        shall be stated in the contract. The basis is the date 12        or average over a specified period that produces the 13        value of the 5-year Constant Maturity Treasury Rate to 14        be used at each redetermination date.15        (C) During the period or term that a contract provides 16    substantive participation in an equity indexed benefit, it 17    may increase the reduction described in subdivision 18    (4)(B)(ii) above by up to an additional 100 basis points 19    to reflect the value of the equity index benefit. The 20    present value at the contract issue date, and at each 21    redetermination date thereafter, of the additional 22    reduction shall not exceed market value of the benefit. 23    The Director may require a demonstration that the present 24    value of the additional reduction does not exceed the 25    market value of the benefit. Lacking such a demonstration 26    that is acceptable to the Director, the Director may   SB2872 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 16830 BAB 30239 b1    disallow or limit the additional reduction.2        (D) The Director may adopt rules to implement the 3    provisions of subdivision (4)(C) and to provide for 4    further adjustments to the calculation of minimum 5    nonforfeiture amounts for contracts that provide 6    substantive participation in an equity index benefit and 7    for other contracts that the Director determines 8    adjustments are justified.9    (5) Computation of Present Value. Any paid-up annuity 10benefit available under a contract shall be such that its 11present value on the date annuity payments are to commence is 12at least equal to the minimum nonforfeiture amount on that 13date. Present value shall be computed using the mortality 14table, if any, and the interest rates specified in the 15contract for determining the minimum paid-up annuity benefits 16guaranteed in the contract.17    (6) Calculation of Cash Surrender Value. For contracts 18that provide cash surrender benefits, the cash surrender 19benefits available prior to maturity shall not be less than 20the present value as of the date of surrender of that portion 21of the maturity value of the paid-up annuity benefit that 22would be provided under the contract at maturity arising from 23considerations paid prior to the time of cash surrender 24reduced by the amount appropriate to reflect any prior 25withdrawals from or partial surrenders of the contract, such 26present value being calculated on the basis of an interest   SB2872 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 16830 BAB 30239 b1rate not more than 1% higher than the interest rate specified 2in the contract for accumulating the net considerations to 3determine maturity value, decreased by the amount of any 4indebtedness to the company on the contract, including 5interest due and accrued, and increased by any existing 6additional amounts credited by the company to the contract. In 7no event shall any cash surrender benefit be less than the 8minimum nonforfeiture amount at that time. The death benefit 9under such contracts shall be at least equal to the cash 10surrender benefit.11    (7) Calculation of Paid-up Annuity Benefits. For contracts 12that do not provide cash surrender benefits, the present value 13of any paid-up annuity benefit available as a nonforfeiture 14option at any time prior to maturity shall not be less than the 15present value of that portion of the maturity value of the 16paid-up annuity benefit provided under the contract arising 17from considerations paid prior to the time the contract is 18surrendered in exchange for, or changed to, a deferred paid-up 19annuity, such present value being calculated for the period 20prior to the maturity date on the basis of the interest rate 21specified in the contract for accumulating the net 22considerations to determine maturity value, and increased by 23any additional amounts credited by the company to the 24contract. For contracts that do not provide any death benefits 25prior to the commencement of any annuity payments, present 26values shall be calculated on the basis of such interest rate   SB2872 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 16830 BAB 30239 b1and the mortality table specified in the contract for 2determining the maturity value of the paid-up annuity benefit. 3However, in no event shall the present value of a paid-up 4annuity benefit be less than the minimum nonforfeiture amount 5at that time.6    (8) Maturity Date. For the purpose of determining the 7benefits calculated under subsections (6) and (7), in the case 8of annuity contracts under which an election may be made to 9have annuity payments commence at optional maturity dates, the 10maturity date shall be deemed to be the latest date for which 11election shall be permitted by the contract, but shall not be 12deemed to be later than the anniversary of the contract next 13following the annuitant's seventieth birthday or the tenth 14anniversary of the contract, whichever is later.15    (9) Disclosure of Limited Death Benefits. A contract that 16does not provide cash surrender benefits or does not provide 17death benefits at least equal to the minimum nonforfeiture 18amount prior to the commencement of any annuity payments shall 19include a statement in a prominent place in the contract that 20such benefits are not provided.21    (10) Inclusion of Lapse of Time Considerations. Any 22paid-up annuity, cash surrender, or death benefits available 23at any time, other than on the contract anniversary under any 24contract with fixed scheduled considerations, shall be 25calculated with allowance for the lapse of time and the 26payment of any scheduled considerations beyond the beginning   SB2872 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 16830 BAB 30239 b1of the contract year in which cessation of payment of 2considerations under the contract occurs.3    (11) Proration of Values; Additional Benefits. For a 4contract which provides, within the same contract by rider or 5supplemental contract provision, both annuity benefits and 6life insurance benefits that are in excess of the greater of 7cash surrender benefits or a return of the gross 8considerations with interest, the minimum nonforfeiture 9benefits shall be equal to the sum of the minimum 10nonforfeiture benefits for the annuity portion and the minimum 11nonforfeiture benefits, if any, for the life insurance portion 12computed as if each portion were a separate contract. 13Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (5), (6), (7), 14(8), and (10), additional benefits payable in the event of 15total and permanent disability, as reversionary annuity or 16deferred reversionary annuity benefits, or as other policy 17benefits additional to life insurance, endowment, and annuity 18benefits, and considerations for all such additional benefits, 19shall be disregarded in ascertaining the minimum nonforfeiture 20amounts, paid-up annuity, cash surrender, and death benefits 21that may be required under this Section. The inclusion of such 22benefits shall not be required in any paid-up benefits, unless 23the additional benefits separately would require minimum 24nonforfeiture amounts, paid-up annuity, cash surrender, and 25death benefits.26    (12) Rules. The Director may adopt rules to implement the   SB2872 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 16830 BAB 30239 b1provisions of this Section.2    (13) Effective Date. After August 6, 2004 (the effective 3date of Public Act 93-873), a company may elect to apply its 4provisions to annuity contracts on a contract form-by-contract 5form basis before July 1, 2006. In all other instances, this 6Section shall become operative with respect to annuity 7contracts issued by the company on or after July 1, 2006. 8    (14) (Blank). 9(Source: P.A. 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.